Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1892] Advisory council to Hawaii natural energy institute. (a) The institute shall establish an advisory
council of seven members, appointed by the president from a list of nominees
submitted by the director of the institute and the energy resources coordinator
of the department of business, economic development, and tourism. The members
of the advisory council shall be from the general public, the energy industry,
technology providers, state agencies whose primary functions relate to energy planning
and policy analyses, and environmental groups, or other relevant stakeholder
representatives as recommended by the director of the institute and the energy
resources coordinator. Members shall be selected on the basis of their proven
expertise and interest in the field of renewable energy. The director of the
institute and the energy resources coordinator shall serve as ex officio
nonvoting members of the advisory council.

(b) The primary role of the advisory council
shall be to make recommendations to the director on the award of contracts and
grants funded through the institute.

(c) The advisory council may advise the
director on matters of strategic planning, goals and objectives, significant
initiatives of the institute, and other matters as determined by the director.
[L 2007, c 253, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next